public_html/app/tools/lang/data/dict-vec-crx-build/vec.aff
FLAG UTF-8
# vèrbi -<is>ír/-ír
# themeT1 + ir/AfE
# themeT8 + o/fEJL
SFX f Y 253
SFX f 0 me/G ir
SFX f ir é/FP ir
SFX f ir éa/FJLP ir
SFX f ir éami/K ir
SFX f ir éau/Q ir
SFX f ir ée/JL ir
SFX f ir éelo/B ir
SFX f ir éeƚo/B ir
SFX f ir éemi/K ir
SFX f ir éi/NP ir
SFX f ir éimo/L ir
SFX f ir éimoi/M ir
SFX f ir éitu/O ir
SFX f ir éndome/G ir
SFX f ir éndomene/G ir
SFX f ir éo/JL ir
SFX f ir éomi/K ir
SFX f ir ésimo ir
SFX f ir éu/Q ir
SFX f ir évami/K ir
SFX f ir évau/Q ir
SFX f ir évelo/B ir
SFX f ir éveƚo/B ir
SFX f ir évemi/K ir
SFX f ir évimo/L ir
SFX f ir évimoi/M ir
SFX f ir évitu/O ir
SFX f ir évomi/K ir
SFX f ir í/FP ir
SFX f ir ía/FJLP ir
SFX f ir íami/K ir
SFX f ir íau/Q ir
SFX f ir íe/JL ir
SFX f ir íelo/B ir
SFX f ir íeƚo/B ir
SFX f ir íemi/K ir
SFX f ir íi/NP ir
SFX f ir íimo/L ir
SFX f ir íimoi/M ir
SFX f ir íitu/O ir
SFX f ir ímoi/M ir
SFX f ir índome/G ir
SFX f ir índomene/G ir
SFX f ir ío/JL ir
SFX f ir íomi/K ir
SFX f ir írmene/G ir
SFX f ir íselo/B ir
SFX f ir íseƚo/B ir
SFX f ir ísemi/K ir
SFX f ir ísime/H ir
SFX f ir ísimene/G ir
SFX f ir ísimo ir
SFX f ir ísitu/O ir
SFX f ir ísome/G ir
SFX f ir ísomene/G ir
SFX f ir ísomi/K ir
SFX f ir íu/Q ir
SFX f ir ívami/K ir
SFX f ir ívau/Q ir
SFX f ir ívelo/B ir
SFX f ir íveƚo/B ir
SFX f ir ívemi/K ir
SFX f ir ívimo/L ir
SFX f ir ívimoi/M ir
SFX f ir ívitu/O ir
SFX f ir ívomi/K ir
SFX f ir a/E ir
SFX f ir arà/FJLN ir
SFX f ir aràe/F ir
SFX f ir aràvelo/B ir
SFX f ir aràveƚo/B ir
SFX f ir aràvemi/K ir
SFX f ir arè/JL ir
SFX f ir arèmi/K ir
SFX f ir aré/P ir
SFX f ir arémoi/M ir
SFX f ir arémome/G ir
SFX f ir arémomene/G ir
SFX f ir arésimo/L ir
SFX f ir arésimoi/M ir
SFX f ir arésitu/O ir
SFX f ir aréu/Q ir
SFX f ir aría/FJLN ir
SFX f ir aríami/K ir
SFX f ir aríatu/O ir
SFX f ir aríe/FJL ir
SFX f ir aríelo/B ir
SFX f ir aríeƚo/B ir
SFX f ir aríemi/K ir
SFX f ir arísitu/O ir
SFX f ir arò/JL ir
SFX f ir aròmi/K ir
SFX f ir aralo/B ir
SFX f ir araƚo/B ir
SFX f ir arami/K ir
SFX f ir aratu/O ir
SFX f ir arave/FS ir
SFX f ir aremo/EL ir
SFX f ir aren/L ir
SFX f ir areni/M ir
SFX f ir arense ir
SFX f ir aresi/P ir
SFX f ir aresiu/Q ir
SFX f ir arié/P ir
SFX f ir ariéu/Q ir
SFX f ir arion/L ir
SFX f ir arioni/M ir
SFX f ir arionse ir
SFX f ir arisen/L ir
SFX f ir ariseni/M ir
SFX f ir arisense ir
SFX f ir arisié/P ir
SFX f ir arisiéu/Q ir
SFX f ir arisi/P ir
SFX f ir arision/L ir
SFX f ir arisioni/M ir
SFX f ir arisionse ir
SFX f ir arisiu/Q ir
SFX f ir arison/L ir
SFX f ir arisoni/M ir
SFX f ir arisonse ir
SFX f ir aron/L ir
SFX f ir aroni/M ir
SFX f ir aronse ir
SFX f ir e/EFIJKL ir
SFX f ir ede/P ir
SFX f ir ege/P ir
SFX f ir elo/B ir
SFX f ir eƚo/B ir
SFX f ir emi/K ir
SFX f ir en/L ir
SFX f ir endo/E ir
SFX f ir eni/M ir
SFX f ir ense ir
SFX f ir ente/I ir
SFX f ir erà/FJLN ir
SFX f ir eràe/F ir
SFX f ir eràvelo/B ir
SFX f ir eràveƚo/B ir
SFX f ir eràvemi/K ir
SFX f ir erè/JL ir
SFX f ir erèmi/K ir
SFX f ir eré/P ir
SFX f ir erémoi/M ir
SFX f ir erémome/G ir
SFX f ir erémomene/G ir
SFX f ir erésimo/L ir
SFX f ir erésimoi/M ir
SFX f ir erésitu/O ir
SFX f ir eréu/Q ir
SFX f ir ería/FJLN ir
SFX f ir eríami/K ir
SFX f ir eríatu/O ir
SFX f ir eríe/FJL ir
SFX f ir eríelo/B ir
SFX f ir eríeƚo/B ir
SFX f ir eríemi/K ir
SFX f ir erísitu/O ir
SFX f ir erò/JL ir
SFX f ir eròmi/K ir
SFX f ir eralo/B ir
SFX f ir eraƚo/B ir
SFX f ir erami/K ir
SFX f ir eratu/O ir
SFX f ir erave/FS ir
SFX f ir eremo/EL ir
SFX f ir eren/L ir
SFX f ir ereni/M ir
SFX f ir erense ir
SFX f ir eresi/P ir
SFX f ir eresiu/Q ir
SFX f ir erié/P ir
SFX f ir eriéu/Q ir
SFX f ir erion/L ir
SFX f ir erioni/M ir
SFX f ir erionse ir
SFX f ir erisen/L ir
SFX f ir eriseni/M ir
SFX f ir erisense ir
SFX f ir erisié/P ir
SFX f ir erisiéu/Q ir
SFX f ir erisi/P ir
SFX f ir erision/L ir
SFX f ir erisioni/M ir
SFX f ir erisionse ir
SFX f ir erisiu/Q ir
SFX f ir erison/L ir
SFX f ir erisoni/M ir
SFX f ir erisonse ir
SFX f ir eron/L ir
SFX f ir eroni/M ir
SFX f ir eronse ir
SFX f ir ese/IT ir
SFX f ir esto/BI ir
SFX f ir eva/FJLP ir
SFX f ir eve/JL ir
SFX f ir evi/NP ir
SFX f ir evo/JL ir
SFX f ir i/EFN ir
SFX f ir o/JKL ir
SFX f ir omi/K ir
SFX f ir on/EL ir
SFX f ir oni/M ir
SFX f ir onme/G ir
SFX f r é/P ir
SFX f r éu/Q ir
SFX f r do/B ir
SFX f r ede/P ir
SFX f r ege/P ir
SFX f r me/H ir
SFX f r mo/L ir
SFX f r ndo/E ir
SFX f r on/EL [^cijɉñ]ir
SFX f r oni/M [^cijɉñ]ir
SFX f r onme/G [^cijɉñ]ir
SFX f r sé/P ir
SFX f r séu/Q ir
SFX f r sa/E ir
SFX f r se/EFIJL ir
SFX f r sede/P ir
SFX f r sege/P ir
SFX f r sen/L ir
SFX f r seni/M ir
SFX f r sense ir
SFX f r sié ir
SFX f r sié/P ir
SFX f r si/EFN ir
SFX f r siede/P ir
SFX f r siege/P ir
SFX f r sion/L ir
SFX f r sioni/M ir
SFX f r sionse ir
SFX f r so/EJL ir
SFX f r son/L ir
SFX f r soni/M ir
SFX f r sonse ir
SFX f r sto/BI ir
SFX f r tu/O ir
SFX f r va/FJLP ir
SFX f r ve/JL ir
SFX f r ven/L ir
SFX f r veni/M ir
SFX f r vense ir
SFX f r vié/P ir
SFX f r viéu/Q ir
SFX f r vi/NP ir
SFX f r vion/L ir
SFX f r vioni/M ir
SFX f r vionse ir
SFX f r vo/JL ir
SFX f r von/L ir
SFX f r voni/M ir
SFX f r vonse ir

SFX g Y 16
SFX g i e/G omi
SFX g i ene/G omi
SFX g mi ni/M omi
SFX g omi ame/G omi
SFX g omi amene/G omi
SFX g omi ami/K omi
SFX g omi elo/B omi
SFX g omi eƚo/B omi
SFX g omi eme/G omi
SFX g omi emene/G omi
SFX g omi emi/K omi
SFX g omi ime/G omi
SFX g omi imene/G omi
SFX g omi imi/K omi
SFX g omi itu/O omi
SFX g omi u/Q omi
