public_html/app/tools/lang/data/dict-vec-crx-build/vec.dic
argoméntomi/gK	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s is:interrogative_1s st:argomentar
xbàlomi/gK	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s is:interrogative_1s st:xbalar
arbàsomi/gK	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s is:interrogative_1s st:arbasar
strabévomi/gK	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s is:interrogative_1s st:strabéver
xbòkoƚomi/gK	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s is:interrogative_1s st:xbokoƚar
xbragésomi/gK	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s is:interrogative_1s st:xbragesar
xbudèƚomi/gK	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s is:interrogative_1s st:xbudeƚar
cílomi/gK	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s is:interrogative_1s st:cilar
dòlomi/gK	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s is:interrogative_1s st:dolar
đeneralídomi/gK	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s is:interrogative_1s st:đeneralidar
eƚèxomi/gK	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s is:interrogative_1s st:eƚèxer st:eƚèxar
faƚívomi/gK	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s is:interrogative_1s st:faƚivar
deskonfàrmomi/gK	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s is:interrogative_1s st:deskonfarmar
dexafítomi/gK	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s is:interrogative_1s st:dexafitar
fràjomi/gK	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s is:interrogative_1s st:frajar
perfúmomi/gK	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s is:interrogative_1s st:perfumar
dexgàrdomi/gK	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s is:interrogative_1s st:dexgardar
ingràsiomi/gK	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s is:interrogative_1s st:ingrasiar
xgúsomi/gK	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s is:interrogative_1s st:xgusar
ɉústomi/gK	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s is:interrogative_1s st:ɉustar
interkàlomi/gK	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s is:interrogative_1s st:interkalar
kansónomi/gK	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s is:interrogative_1s st:kansonar
inkàstromi/gK	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s is:interrogative_1s st:inkastrar
inkokónomi/gK	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s is:interrogative_1s st:inkokonar
kòñomi/gK	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s is:interrogative_1s st:kòñer
strakòxomi/gK	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s is:interrogative_1s st:strakòxer
skuintèrnomi/gK	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s is:interrogative_1s st:skuinternar
xlàtomi/gK	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s is:interrogative_1s st:xlatar
xlikíñomi/gK	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s is:interrogative_1s st:xlikiñar
reƚúxomi/gK	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s is:interrogative_1s st:reƚúxer
martirídomi/gK	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s is:interrogative_1s st:martiridar
xmaravéjomi/gK	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s is:interrogative_1s st:xmaravejar
xmoltónomi/gK	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s is:interrogative_1s st:xmoltonar
muxónomi/gK	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s is:interrogative_1s st:muxonar
xñòkoƚomi/gK	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s is:interrogative_1s st:xñokoƚar
inpàcolomi/gK	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s is:interrogative_1s st:inpacolar
pariso/fEJL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:parir
aparir/AfE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
aparo/fEJL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:aparir
apariso/fEJL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:aparir
desparir/AfE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
desparo/fEJL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:desparir
despariso/fEJL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:desparir
deskonparir/AfE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
deskonparo/fEJL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:deskonparir
deskonpariso/fEJL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:deskonparir
inpàromi/gK	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s is:interrogative_1s st:inparar
konparir/AfE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
konparo/fEJL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:konparir
konpariso/fEJL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:konparir
reaparir/AfE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
reaparo/fEJL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:reaparir
reapariso/fEJL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:reaparir
rekonparir/AfE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
rekonparo/fEJL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:rekonparir
rekonpariso/fEJL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:rekonparir
sparir/AfE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
sparo/fEJL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:sparir
spariso/fEJL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:sparir
skonparir/AfE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
skonparo/fEJL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:skonparir
skonpariso/fEJL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:skonparir
partir/AfE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
parto/fEJL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:partir
partiso/fEJL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:partir
departir/AfE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
departo/fEJL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:departir
departiso/fEJL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:departir
despartir/AfE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
despartiso/fEJL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:despartir
inparto/fEJL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:inpartir
konpartir/AfE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
konpartiso/fEJL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:konpartir
reparto/fEJL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:repartir
spartir/AfE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
spartiso/fEJL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:spartir
skonparto/fEJL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:skonpartir
inpéjomi/gK	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s is:interrogative_1s st:inpejar
deparir/AfE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
depariso/fEJL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:deparir
píncomi/gK	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s is:interrogative_1s st:pincar
prèdegomi/gK	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s is:interrogative_1s st:predegar
rígoƚomi/gK	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s is:interrogative_1s st:rigoƚar
scopíđomi/gK	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s is:interrogative_1s st:scopiđar
inskàrpiomi/gK	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s is:interrogative_1s st:inskarpiar
sòrbo/fEJL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:sorbir
spígoƚomi/gK	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s is:interrogative_1s st:spigoƚar
sumàriomi/gK	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s is:interrogative_1s st:sumariar
teràsomi/gK	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s is:interrogative_1s st:terasar
tripúdiomi/gK	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s is:interrogative_1s st:tripudiar
sirkóndomi/gK	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s is:interrogative_1s st:sirkondar
inverdèlomi/gK	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s is:interrogative_1s st:inverdelar
vertir/AfE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
vertiso/fEJL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:vertir
avèrto/fEJL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:avertir
divertir/AfE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
divertiso/fEJL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:divertir
pervèrto/fEJL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:pervertir
parvertir/AfE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
parvertiso/fEJL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:parvertir
xèlomi/gK	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s is:interrogative_1s st:xelar
